Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4901
Act, how cited.

Sections 77-4901 to 77-4935 shall be known and may be cited as the Quality Jobs Act.

Laws 1995, LB 829, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1368, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 264, § 3;

Laws 1998, LB 1104, § 21.